Wyoming, session 2025, HB0141.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-4-1101 is created to read:

ARTICLE 11
HEALTH ORGANIZATIONS RULES PROHIBITED

HB0141

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0260
35-4-1101. Consideration and compliance with
requirements of specified health organizations;
limitations.

The United States centers for disease control and
prevention and the world health organization shall have no
jurisdiction in Wyoming and any requirements, mandates,
recommendations, instructions or guidance provided,
promulgated or established by either organization shall not
be binding in this state to justify any mask, vaccine or
medical testing requirements for COVID-19 and any variant
thereof and shall have no force or effect in Wyoming.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0141